Utah statutes.
58-1-302.   License by endorsement.

The division may issue a license without examination to a person who has been licensed in any state, district, or territory of the United States or in any foreign country, whose education, experience, and examination requirements are, or were at the time the license was issued, equal to those of this state.  Before any person may be issued a license under this section, he shall produce satisfactory evidence of his qualifications, identity, and good standing in his occupation or profession.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

